Illinois, session 104th, HB890.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Infrastructure Development Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 560/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Infrastructure Development Act.9(Source: P.A. 102-141, eff. 7-23-21.)